Florida, session 2026, HB305.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
20
21 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
22 1008.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
23 1008.22 Student assessment program for public schools.—
24 (3) STATEWIDE, STANDARDIZED ASSESSMENT PROGRAM.—The
25 Commissioner of Education shall design and implement a
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
26 statewide, standardized assessment program aligned to the core
27 curricular content established in the state academic standards.
28 The commissioner also must develop or select and implement a
29 common battery of assessment tools that will be used in all
30 juvenile justice education programs in the state. These tools
31 must accurately measure the core curricular content established
32 in the state academic standards. Participation in the assessment
33 program is mandatory for all school districts and all students
34 attending public schools, including adult students seeking a
35 standard high school diploma under s. 1003.4282 and students in
36 Department of Juvenile Justice education programs, except as
37 otherwise provided by law. If a student does not participate in
38 the assessment program, the school district must notify the
39 student's parent and provide the parent with information
40 regarding the implications of such nonparticipation. The
41 statewide, standardized assessment program shall be designed and
42 implemented as follows:
43 (d) Students with disabilities; Florida Alternate
44 Assessment; English language learners.—
45 1. Each district school board must provide instruction to
46 prepare students with disabilities in the core content knowledge
47 and skills necessary for successful grade-to-grade progression
48 and high school graduation.
49 2. A student with a disability, as defined in s. 1007.02,
50 for whom the individual education plan (IEP) team determines
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
51 that the statewide, standardized assessments under this section
52 cannot accurately measure the student's abilities, taking into
53 consideration all allowable accommodations, shall have
54 assessment results waived for the purpose of receiving a course
55 grade and a standard high school diploma. Such waiver must shall
56 be designated on the student's transcript. The statement of
57 waiver is shall be limited to a statement that performance on an
58 assessment was waived for the purpose of receiving a course
59 grade or a standard high school diploma, as applicable.
60 3. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, based
61 upon recommendations of the commissioner, for the provision of
62 assessment accommodations for students with disabilities and for
63 students who have limited English proficiency.
64 a. Accommodations that negate the validity of a statewide,
65 standardized assessment are not allowed during the
66 administration of the assessment. However, instructional
67 accommodations are allowed in the classroom if identified in a
68 student's IEP. Students using instructional accommodations in
69 the classroom which that are not allowed on a statewide,
70 standardized assessment may have assessment results waived if
71 the IEP team determines that the assessment cannot accurately
72 measure the student's abilities.
73 b. If a student is provided with instructional
74 accommodations in the classroom which that are not allowed as
75 accommodations for statewide, standardized assessments, the
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
76 district must inform the parent in writing and provide the
77 parent with information regarding the impact on the student's
78 ability to meet expected performance levels. A parent must
79 provide signed consent for a student to receive classroom
80 instructional accommodations that would not be available or
81 permitted on a statewide, standardized assessment and
82 acknowledge in writing that he or she understands the
83 implications of such instructional accommodations.
84 c. If a student's IEP states that online administration of
85 a statewide, standardized assessment will significantly impair
86 the student's ability to perform, the assessment must shall be
87 administered in hard copy.
88 d.(I) By the 2027-2028 school year, the Department of
89 Education shall develop a version of each statewide,
90 standardized assessment in the three most prevalent languages
91 represented in the English language learner population in this
92 state. The department shall establish criteria for when the use
93 of such assessments in a language other than English is
94 appropriate. A parent of a student who is an English language
95 learner may prohibit his or her student from being administered
96 an assessment in a language other than English.
97 (II) The department shall develop a timetable and an
98 action plan to develop and implement the assessments in the
99 additional languages as required under sub-sub-subparagraph (I)
100 in addition to such assessments in additional languages, as
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
101 feasible.
102 4. For students with significant cognitive disabilities,
103 the Department of Education shall provide for implementation of
104 the Florida Alternate Assessment to accurately measure the core
105 curricular content established in the state academic standards.
106 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of section
107 1008.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
108 1008.25 Public school student progression; student
109 support; coordinated screening and progress monitoring;
110 reporting requirements.—
111 (9) COORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.—
112 (a) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the
113 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a
114 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress
115 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
116 Program and public schools. The system must:
117 1. Measure student progress in meeting the appropriate
118 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in
119 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by
120 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational
121 strengths and needs of students.
122 2. For students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
123 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral
124 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness,
125 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
126 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a
127 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that
128 measures equivalent levels of growth.
129 3. Be a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate
130 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and
131 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress;
132 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading
133 or mathematics, including identifying students with
134 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning
135 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by
136 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia
137 shall undergo further screening. Beginning with the 2023-2024
138 school year, the coordinated screening and progress monitoring
139 system must be computer-adaptive.
140 4. Provide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
141 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68.
142 5. Provide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
143 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with
144 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and
145 parent communication.
146 6. Provide baseline data to the department of each
147 student's readiness for kindergarten. The determination of
148 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each
149 student's initial progress monitoring assessment in
150 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a student's
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 305 2026
151 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department
152 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s.
153 1002.68(4).
154 7. Assess how well educational goals and curricular
155 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state
156 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the
157 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for
158 providers, districts, and schools.
159 8. By the 2027-2028 school year, be available in the three
160 most prevalent languages represented in the English language
161 learner population in this state for all written portions of the
162 system. The department shall develop a timetable and an action
163 plan to develop and implement the written portions of the system
164 in such languages as required by this subparagraph in addition
165 to such portions in additional languages, as feasible. The
166 department shall establish criteria for when the use of such
167 portions of the system in a language other than English is
168 appropriate. A parent of a student who is an English language
169 learner may prohibit his or her student from being administered
170 such portions of the system in a language other than English.
171 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb305-00